Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1706
Public hearing; procedure.

At least one public hearing shall be held by the city council, village board of trustees, or county board of commissioners or supervisors no sooner than ninety days but no later than one hundred twenty days after receipt of the request for siting approval. A hearing shall be preceded by published notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, city, or village in which the proposed site is located. The public hearing shall develop a record sufficient to form the basis of an appeal of the decision.

Laws 1991, LB 813, § 6.